District of Columbia statutes.
48-833.05

Confidentiality; public information.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, information submitted to the Department pursuant to this subchapter is confidential and is not a public record. Data compiled in aggregate form by the Department for the purposes of reporting required by this subchapter is a public record as long as it does not reveal trade information that is protected by District, state, or federal law.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 305, 51 DCR 3688